Utah statutes.
78A-2-210.   Change of place of trial because of calamity.
(1)  The presiding judge may order court proceedings to be held at another
location within the jurisdiction if the presiding judge determines it is
necessary because of:
(a)  war;
(b)  insurrection;
(c)  pestilence;
(d)  public calamity or natural disaster; or
(e)  destruction of or danger to the building in which court is held.
(2)  Any order to move court proceedings shall be reduced to writing and filed
with the clerk of the court for publication.
